Hawaii statutes.
§342B-44 Injunctive and other relief.
The director may institute a civil action in any environmental court of
competent jurisdiction for injunctive and other relief to prevent any violation
of this chapter, any rule adopted, condition of a permit, or variance issued
pursuant to this chapter, without the necessity of prior revocation of the
permit or variance, to impose and collect civil penalties, to collect
administrative penalties, or obtain other relief. The environmental court shall
have the power to grant relief in accordance with the Hawaii rules of civil
procedure. [L 1992, c 240, pt of §1; am L 1995, c 180, §3; am L 2014, c
218, §8]

Rules of Court

Injunctions, see HRCP rule 65.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next